New Jersey, session 221, S975.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Superintendent of State Police shall collect and publish data concerning the number of cannabis-related motor vehicle crash fatalities that occur in the State annually. For the purposes of this section, cannabis shall have the same definition as set forth in section 3 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-33). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.